en: Provencal-style tart
fr: Tarte à la provençale

en: Vegetables pies, Vegetables tarts
de: Gemüsekuchen
fr: Tartes aux légumes, Tarte aux légumes
hr: Pite od povrća
lt: Daržovių pyragai
nl: Groentetaarten

en: Pastilla filled with chicken (pie)
fr: Pastilla au poulet

en: Goat cheese and spinach tart
fr: Tarte épinard chèvre
hr: Tart od kozjeg sira i špinata
lt: Ožkos sūrio ir špinatų pyragai

en: Börek
xx: Börek
ad: Burekas
ar: بوريك
az: Piroq
bg: Бюрек
bs: Burek
cs: Burek
el: Μπουρέκι
fa: بورک
he: בורקס
hr: Burek
hy: Բյորեկ
ja: ブレク
jv: Börék
ka: ბორექი
ko: 뵈레크
ku: Boregl
lt: Burekas
mk: Бурек
no: Børek
pl: Burek
ru: Бурекас
sh: Burek
sl: Burek
sq: Byreku
sr: Бурек
sv: Burek
uk: Бурек
uz: Boʻrek

en: Waterzooi
de: Waterzooi
fr: Waterzooi
hr: Waterzooi
nl: Waterzooi

en: Soups
bg: Супи
ca: Sopes
da: Suppe
de: Suppen, Suppe
es: Sopas
fi: keitot
fr: Soupes, soupe
he: מרקים
hr: juhe, juha
hu: Levesek
it: Minestre
ja: スープ
lt: Sriubos
nl: Soepen
pl: Zupy
pt: Sopas
ro: Supe
ru: Супы, Суп
sv: Soppor, soppa
th: ซุป
tr: Çorba
zh: 汤

en: Soup mixes
nl: Soepmixes, Soepmengsels

en: Ramen Soup, ramen noodle soup
fr: Soupe Ramen, soupe de Ramen

en: Canned soups
de: Dosensuppen
es: Sopas en conserva, Sopas enlatadas
fi: purkitetut keitot
fr: Soupes en conserve
hr: Konzervirane juhe
it: Zuppe in scatola
lt: Konservuotos sriubos
nl: Soepen in blik/pot
pt: Sopas em lata
ro: Conserve cu supă
ru: Консервированные супы
zh: 汤罐头

en: Dehydrated soups, Dried soups, Instant soups
de: Instantsuppen
es: Sopas deshidratadas, Sopas de sobre deshidratadas, Sopas instantáneas, Cremas instantáneas
fi: kuivatut keitot
fr: Soupes déshydratées, soupes lyophilisées, soupe déshydratée, soupe lyophilisée, soupes concentrées, soupes instantanées, soupe concentrée, soupe instantanée
he: מרקים מיובשים, מרקים יבשים, מרקי אינסטנט, מרק אינסטנט, מנה חמה
hr: Dehidrirane juhe
it: Zuppe disidratate
lt: Greito pagaminimo sriubos, dehidratuotos sriubos, Greito paruošimo sriubos
nl: Instantsoepen, Instant soepen, Gedroogde soepen
pl: Zupy w proszku
pt: Sopa Instantânea
ro: Supă instant
tr: Hazır çorba

en: Frozen soups
de: Tiefkühlsuppen, Gefrorene Suppen
es: Sopas congeladas
fi: pakastekeitot
fr: Soupes surgelées
hr: Smrznute juhe
lt: Šaldytos sriubos
nl: Diepvriessoepen
pl: Zupy mrożone
ru: Замороженные супы
tr: Dondurulmuş çorba

en: Refrigerated soups
es: Sopas refrigeradas
fi: keittopakasteet
fr: Soupes réfrigérées
hr: Ohlađene juhe
it: Zuppe refrigerate
lt: Šaltai laikomos sriubos
nl: Gekoelde soepen

en: Miso soup
de: Miso-Suppe
es: Sopas de miso
fi: Misokeitto
fr: Soupe miso
hr: Miso juha
ja: 味噌汁
nl: Misosoepen
ru: Мисосиру

en: Mustard soups
fr: Soupes de moutarde
hr: Juhe od gorušice
lt: Garstyčių sriubos
nl: Mosterdsoepen

en: Moroccan soups
fr: Soupes marocaine, Harira
hr: Marokanske juhe
lt: Morokietiškos sriubos
nl: Marrokaanse soepen

en: Dehydrated Moroccan soup
fr: Soupe marocaine déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana marokanska juha
lt: Greito paruošimo Morokietiškos sriubos

en: Sweet potato soups
nl: Zoete aardappelsoepen

en: Fish soups
de: Fischsuppen
es: Sopa de pescado
fi: Kalakeitto
fr: Soupes de poissons, soupe de poisson
he: מרקי דגים
hr: Riblje juhe
it: Zuppe di pesce
lt: Sriubos su žuvimi
nl: Vissoepen
pl: Zupa rybna
pt: Sopas de peixe
ru: Рыбные супы
tr: Balık çorbası
zh: 鱼汤

en: Reconstituted fish soup
fr: Soupe de poissons reconstituée
hr: Rekonstruirana riblja juha
lt: Paruoštos sriubos su žuvimi